Missouri, session 2026, HB3229.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 478.700, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 478.700, to read as follows:
478.700. 1. There shall be [two] three circuit judges in the twenty-fifth judicial
circuit [consisting of the counties of Maries, Phelps, Pulaski and Texas]. These judges shall
sit in divisions numbered one [and], two, and three.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judge in
division one shall be elected in 1982. The circuit judge appointed by the governor in 2025
for division three shall serve until January 1, 2029. A circuit judge for division three
shall be elected in 2028 for a four-year term and in 2032 for a full six-year term, and
every six years thereafter.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.